zh-CN: 座垫设计: 中空通道; 镂空; 无鼻; 分叉鼻; 弹簧避震; 传统; 其他
ro-RO: Designul șeii: Canal central; Decupaj; Fără nas; Nas despicat; Cu arcuri; Tradițional; Altele
sl-SI: Zasnova sedla: Osrednji kanal; Z izrezom; Brez nosu; Deljen nos; Vzmeteno; Tradicionalna; Drugo
lt-LT: Balnelio dizainas: Centrinis kanalas; Išpjova; Be „nosies“ (priekinės dalies); Padalinta „nosis“; Su spyruoklėmis; Tradicinis; Kita
zh-TW: 座墊設計: 中空溝槽; 挖空; 無鼻; 雙鼻; 彈簧; 傳統式; 其他
sk-SK: Dizajn sedla: Stredový kanál; Výrez; Bez špičky; Rozdelená špička; Odpružené; Tradičné; Iné
tr: Sele tasarımı: Orta kanal; Oyuklu; Burunsuz; Ayrık burunlu; Yaylı; Geleneksel; Diğer
cs: Design sedla: Středový tunel; Výřez; Bez špičky; Dělená špička; Odpružené; Tradiční; Jiné
de: Satteldesign: Mittelkanal; Aussparung; Nasenlos; Geteilte Nase; Gefedert; Traditionell; Sonstige
hr-HR: Dizajn sedla: Središnji kanal; Izrez; Bez nosa; Podijeljeni nos; S oprugama; Tradicionalno; Ostalo
ru: Конструкция седла: Центральный канал; Вырез; Без носика; Раздвоенный носик; Пружинный; Традиционный; Другое
hu: Nyereg kialakítása: Középső csatorna; Kivágott; Orr nélküli; Osztott orrú; Rugós; Hagyományos; Egyéb
nb: Saldesign: Senterkanal; Utskjæring; Uten nese; Delt nese; Med fjæring; Tradisjonell; Annet
pt-PT: Design do selim: Canal central; Recorte; Sem ponta; Ponta dividida; Com molas; Tradicional; Outro
nl: Zadel ontwerp: Middenkanaal; Uitsparing; Zonder neus; Gespleten neus; Geveerd; Traditioneel; Overige
fr: Type de selle: Canal central; Découpe; Sans bec; Bec fendu; À ressorts; Traditionnelle; Autre
pl: Konstrukcja siodełka: Kanał centralny; Wycięcie; Bez noska; Dzielony nosek; Ze sprężynami; Tradycyjny; Inny
it: Design della sella: Canale centrale; Cut-out; Senza punta; Punta divisa; A molle; Tradizionale; Altro
th: การออกแบบอานม้า: ร่องกลาง; แบบเว้า; ไร้จมูกเบาะ; จมูกเบาะแบบแยก; แบบสปริง; แบบดั้งเดิม; อื่นๆ
en: Saddle design: Central channel; Cut-out; Noseless; Split-nose; Sprung; Traditional; Other
ja: サドルデザイン: センターチャネル; カットアウト; ノーズレス; スプリットノーズ; スプリング付き; トラディショナル; その他
vi: Thiết kế yên ngựa: Rãnh giữa; Khoét lỗ; Không mũi; Mũi chẻ; Có lò xo; Truyền thống; Khác
el: Σχεδιασμός σέλας: Κεντρικό κανάλι; Με άνοιγμα; Χωρίς μύτη; Διαχωρισμένη μύτη; Με ελατήρια; Παραδοσιακό; Άλλο
fi: Satulan muotoilu: Keskikanava; Halkio; Nenätön; Halkaistu nokka; Jousitettu; Perinteinen; Muu
bg-BG: Дизайн на седлото: Централен канал; С отвор; Без нос; Разделен нос; С пружини; Традиционен; Друго
pt-BR: Selim design: Canal central; Vazado; Sem ponta; Ponta dividida; Com molas; Tradicional; Outros
ko: 안장 디자인: 중앙 채널; 컷아웃; 노즈리스; 스플릿 노즈; 스프링 내장형; 전통형; 기타
da: Sadeldesign: Kanal i midten; Udskæring; Uden snude; Delt snude; Fjedret; Traditionel; Andet
sv: Sadeldesign: Central kanal; Utskärning; Utan nos; Delad nos; Fjädrad; Traditionell; Övrigt
es: Diseño de la montura: Canal central; Con abertura; Sin punta; Punta dividida; Con resortes; Tradicional; Otro